District of Columbia statutes.
8-1535

Repealed

Exemptions and waiver.

Repealed.

Dec. 17, 2014, D.C. Law 20-142, § 405, 61 DCR 8045
Oct. 22, 2015, D.C. Law 21-36, § 6172(e), 62 DCR 10905
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 6172(e) of the Fiscal Year 2016 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-127, July 27, 2015, 62 DCR 10201).
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-142: Section 502(g) of D.C. Law 20-142 provided that §§ 403 to 405 of the act shall apply upon the inclusion of their fiscal effect in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register.